Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7205
Use of nationally recognized private accrediting entities; authorized.

The director may recognize accreditation by one or more nationally recognized private accrediting entities, with established and maintained standards, as evidence of meeting some or all of the requirements of the Quality Assessment and Improvement Act. A recognized accrediting entity shall make available to the director its current standards to demonstrate that the entity's standards meet or exceed this state's requirements. The health carrier may provide the director with documentation that a managed care plan has been accredited by the entity.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 55.